Washington statutes.
RCW 39.69.010

"Municipal corporation" defined.

As used in this chapter, "municipal corporation" includes counties, cities, towns, port districts, water-sewer districts, school districts, metropolitan park districts, or such other units of local government which are authorized to issue obligations.

[ 1999 c 153 s 53; 1987 c 19 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.